Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB27.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 214 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Advisory committee" means the Kentucky Parkinson's Disease Research Registry Advisory
Committee established under subsection (3) of this section;
(b) "Cabinet" means the Cabinet for Health and Family Services;
(c) "Movement disorder center" means a health facility licensed under KRS Chapter 216B that operates
outpatient clinics or ambulatory care facilities that employ movement disorder health care providers;
(d) "Movement disorder health care provider" means a licensed physician or osteopath licensed under
KRS Chapter 311 that is fellowship trained in movement disorders as specified by either the
American Academy of Neurology's Movement Disorders section or the Movement Disorder Society's
Pan American Section;
(e) "Parkinson's disease" means a chronic and progressive neurologic disorder resulting from a
deficiency of the neurotransmitter dopamine as a consequence of specific degenerative changes in
the area of the brain called the basal ganglia characterized by tremor at rest, slow movements,
muscle rigidity, stooped posture, and unsteady or shuffling gait;
(f) "Parkinsonisms":
1. Means Parkinson's disease-related conditions that cause a combination of movement
abnormalities such as tremor at rest, slow movement, muscle rigidity, impaired speech, and
muscle stiffness, which often overlap with and can evolve from what appears to be Parkinson's
disease; and
2. Includes multiple system atrophy, dementia with Lewy bodies, corticobasal degeneration, and
progressive supranuclear palsy;
(g) "Registry" means the Kentucky Parkinson's Disease Research Registry established in subsection (2)
of this section; and
(h) "Secretary" means the secretary of the cabinet.
(2) The Kentucky Parkinson's Disease Research Registry is hereby established within the cabinet under the
direction of the secretary, who may enter into contracts, grants, or other agreements as necessary to
administer the registry in accordance with this section.
(3) (a) The secretary shall establish the Kentucky Parkinson's Disease Research Registry Advisory
Committee to assist in the development and implementation of the registry, determine what data will
be collected, and advise the cabinet.
(b) The advisory committee shall be appointed by the secretary and include at least one (1):
1. Neurologist;
2. Movement disorder specialist;
3. Primary care provider;
4. Physician informaticist;
5. Patient living with Parkinson's disease;
6. Public health professional;
7. Population health researcher familiar with health data registries;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
8. Parkinson's disease researcher;
9. Representative from the University of Kentucky College of Medicine with specific expertise in
Parkinson's disease; and
10. Representative from the University of Louisville School of Medicine with specific expertise in
Parkinson's disease.
The secretary may appoint additional members to the advisory committee as he or she deems
necessary.
(4) The cabinet shall:
(a) Promulgate administrative regulations in consultation with the advisory committee and in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to:
1. Designate Parkinson's disease and identified Parkinsonisms as diseases that are required to be
reported to the cabinet;
2. Establish a system of collection and dissemination of information on the incidence and
prevalence of Parkinson's disease and Parkinsonisms in Kentucky and related epidemiological
data;
3. Identify specific data points to be collected based on the following four (4) core categories of
data:
a. Patient demographics;
b. Geography;
c. Diagnosis; and
d. Sufficient information to allow for deduplication of patient records in the registry;
4. Periodically review and revise data points to be collected to ensure data and data collection
procedures adapt to new knowledge and technology;
5. Establish a coding system that removes a patient's name, address, Social Security number,
fingerprints, photograph, and any other information by which the identity of a patient can be
determined with reasonable accuracy; and
6. Develop guidelines and procedures for reviewing and approving requests to use registry data
for valid scientific research;
(b) Receive and collect data for the registry on the incidence and prevalence of Parkinson's disease and
Parkinsonisms in Kentucky and related epidemiological data, and may enter into data-sharing
contracts with data-reporting entities and their associated medical record system vendors to securely
and confidentially receive information related to Parkinson's disease testing, diagnosis, and
treatment; and
(c) Be responsible for any costs incurred in administering the registry and implementing this section.
(5) (a) Beginning January 1, 2026, each movement disorder center that treats a patient with Parkinson's
disease and each movement disorder health care provider who treats or diagnoses Parkinson's
disease or Parkinsonisms for a patient not otherwise reported shall submit a Parkinson's disease
report to the cabinet in a format required or approved by the cabinet.
(b) 1. Movement disorder centers and movement disorder health care providers shall provide each
patient diagnosed with Parkinson's disease or Parkinsonisms with a notice regarding the
reporting and collection of information and patient data on Parkinson's disease.
2. A patient who does not wish to participate in the collection of data for the purposes of research
in the registry may affirmatively opt out in writing after an opportunity to review the
documents and ask questions.
3. If a patient has chosen not to participate and has opted out under subparagraph 2. of this
paragraph, the movement disorder center and the movement disorder health care provider
shall only report that a Parkinson's disease case exists and no further data shall be reported to
the cabinet for the purposes of the registry.

CHAPTER 85 3
4. If a patient has been diagnosed with Parkinson's disease or Parkinsonsisms in error, the
movement disorder center and the movement disorder health care provider shall notify the
cabinet and the cabinet shall remove the patient from the registry.
(c) To ensure compliance with the reporting and notification requirements of this subsection, the
secretary or his or her agent may, upon reasonable notice, inspect a representative sample of the
medical records of patients admitted, diagnosed, or treated for Parkinson's disease or Parkinsonisms
at a movement disorder center.
(d) A movement disorder center or movement disorder health care provider who in good faith submits a
report in accordance with paragraph (a) of this subsection is not liable in any cause of action arising
from the submission of the report.
(e) A movement disorder center or movement disorder health care provider may use automated reporting
methods supplied by the cabinet or the Kentucky Health Information Exchange to meet the
requirements of this subsection.
(6) The cabinet shall make data from the registry, with or without identifiers, available to researchers that have
the approval of an institutional review board in accordance with requirements of the Federal Policy for the
Protection of Human Subjects, 45 C.F.R. pt. 46, and, as applicable, 21 C.F.R. pt. 56, 45 C.F.R. pt. 164, KRS
216.2920 to 216.2929, 900 KAR 7:030 and 7:040, and any other relevant federal or state requirements.
(7) (a) The cabinet may enter into agreements to furnish data collected in the registry to other states'
Parkinson's disease registries, federal Parkinson's disease control agencies, local health officers, or
health researchers not described in subsection (6) of this section for the study of Parkinson's disease.
(b) Before confidential information is disclosed pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection, the out-of-
state registry, agency, officer, or researcher shall agree in writing to maintain the confidentiality of
the information. A researcher shall also:
1. Obtain approval of the researcher's respective committee for the protection of human subjects
under 45 C.F.R. pt. 46; and
2. Provide documentation to the cabinet that demonstrates to the cabinet's satisfaction that the
researcher has established the procedures and ability to maintain the confidentiality of the
information.
(8) (a) Except as specifically provided in this section, all information collected pursuant to this section shall
be confidential.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a disclosure authorized by this section shall include only
the information necessary for the stated purpose of the requested disclosure, used for the approved
purpose, and not be further disclosed.
(c) Provided the security of confidentiality has been documented, the furnishing of confidential
information to the cabinet or its authorized representative in accordance with this section shall not
expose any person, agency, or entity furnishing information to liability, and shall not be considered a
waiver of any privilege or a violation of a confidential relationship.
(d) The cabinet shall maintain an accurate record of all persons who are given access to information
collected by the cabinet pursuant to this section, which shall include:
1. The name of the person authorizing access;
2. Name, title, address, and organizational affiliation of persons given access;
3. Dates of access; and
4. The specific purpose for which accessed information is to be used.
The record of access shall be open to public inspection during normal operating hours of the cabinet.
(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, information collected by the cabinet pursuant to this
section shall not be:
1. Available for subpoena or disclosed, discoverable, or compelled to be produced in any civil,
criminal, administrative, or other proceeding; or
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
2. Deemed admissible as evidence in any civil, criminal, administrative, or other proceeding for
any reason.
(9) This section does not:
(a) Prohibit the publication by the cabinet of reports and statistical compilations that do not in any way
identify individual patients, cases, or sources of information;
(b) Restrict in any way a patient's access to his or her own information; or
(c) Prohibit movement disorder center or movement disorder health care providers from maintaining
their own facility-based Parkinson's disease registries.
(10) (a) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to compel any individual to submit to any medical
examination or supervision by the cabinet, any of its authorized representatives, or an approved
researcher.
(b) A person who seeks information or obtains registry data pursuant to this section shall not contact a
patient on the registry or the patient's family unless the cabinet has first obtained permission for the
contact from the patient or the patient's family.
(11) The cabinet shall provide notice of the mandatory reporting of Parkinson's disease and Parkinsonisms
required under this section on its website and to professional associations representing movement disorder
center and movement disorder health care providers.
(12) (a) By October 1, 2027, and October 1 of each year thereafter, the cabinet shall submit to the Legislative
Research Commission for referral to the Interim Joint Committee on Health Services a yearly
program summary update that includes:
1. The incidence and prevalence of Parkinson's disease and Parkinsonisms in the state by
county;
2. The number of records that have been reported to the cabinet and included in the registry; and
3. Demographic information, including but not limited to patients' age, gender, and race.
(b) In consultation with the advisory committee, the cabinet may include recommendations on necessary
changes to the registry in the yearly program summary update.
(c) The cabinet shall publish the yearly program summary update in a downloadable format on the
website created under subsection (13) of this section.
(13) By October 1, 2027, the cabinet shall create, and update annually thereafter, the Kentucky Parkinson's
Disease Research Registry website where the public can find information related to the Parkinson's disease
and the registry, the yearly program summary update, and any other information deemed relevant by the
advisory committee.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 311A IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "resident" includes newly admitted residents who require transportation from a
hospital to a skilled nursing facility.
(2) A skilled nursing facility or hospital that operates a nonemergency medical transportation service shall be
permitted to transport residents of a skilled nursing facility or hospital who qualify for nonemergency
medical transportation, including transportation via stretcher.
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section:
(a) Prior to a skilled nursing facility or hospital being permitted to provide nonemergency medical
transportation services to a resident, including transportation via stretcher, the contracted
transportation broker responsible for providing nonemergency medical transportation services shall
be given the opportunity to schedule transportation services for the resident; and
(b) Nonemergency medical transportation provided by a skilled nursing facility or hospital, including
transportation via stretcher, under this section shall not be eligible for reimbursement by the
Department for Medicaid Services or any managed care organization with whom the department
contracts for the delivery of Medicaid services.

CHAPTER 85 5
(4) This section shall not be interpreted as prohibiting or otherwise precluding a skilled nursing facility or
hospital from becoming a contracted nonemergency medical transportation services provider.
Signed by Governor March 25, 2025.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version